Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 1. State Marketing Commission
[Repealed].

§§ 69-7-1 through 69-7-29.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1981, ch. 325, § 1, effective from and after July 1, 1981.

§69-7-1. [Codes, 1942, § 4434-05; Laws, 1944, ch. 249, § 5; Laws, 1946, ch. 227, § 2]

§69-7-3. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-14; Laws, 1944, ch. 249, § 14]

§69-7-5. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 249, § 1]

§69-7-7. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-02; Laws, 1944, ch. 249, § 2; Laws, 1946, ch. 227, § 1]

§69-7-9. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-11; Laws, 1944, ch. 249, § 11]

§69-7-11. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-03; Laws, 1944, ch. 249, § 3]

§69-7-13. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-12; Laws, 1944, ch. 249, § 12]

§69-7-15. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-09; Laws, 1944, ch. 249, § 9]

§69-7-17. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-04; Laws, 1944, ch. 249, § 4]

§69-7-19. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-06; Laws, 1944, ch. 249, § 6; Laws, 1946, ch. 227, § 3]

§69-7-21. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-07; Laws, 1944, ch. 249, § 7]

§69-7-23. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-08; Laws, 1944, ch. 249, § 8; Laws, 1946, ch. 227, § 4]

§69-7-25. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-08.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 307, §§ 1-4]

§69-7-27. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-13; Laws, 1944, ch. 249, § 13]

§69-7-29. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-10; Laws, 1944, ch. 249, § 10]